hfst/twol-som.txt
!! =================================== !
!! The Somali  morphophonological file !
!! =================================== !

! Notes:
!  If forms disappear but the rule should work, make sure
!  that the pair transforming exists in the Alphabet

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ' C
 ɖ χ ʃ
 á í ú é ó ý
 á:a í:i ú:u é:e ó:o ý:y
 sh kh dh 
  
 %^V:0 C
 
 ! lt
 ! %{ŧ%}:h
 ! %{ŧ%}:t
 ! %{ŧ%}:s

 %#
 ! for testing remove :0
 @N@:0
 @V1@:0
 @V2A@:0
 @V2B@:0
 @V3A@:0
 @V3B@:0
 @PREFIXING@:0
 @PROG@:0
 @INF@

 ! Morphophon
 %{o%}:a
 ! o:a

 %{ŧ%}
 l:s
 %{ŧ%}:h
 %{đ%}
 %{ñ%}
 %{GD%}
 %{e%}:e
 %{m%}:m
 %{C2%}:0
 %{n%}:0
 %{n%}:n
 %{ae%}:a
 %{d%}:d
 ! d:0

 ! Boundary markers
 ! Ideally %{#%} for root boundary, %{##%} for word-final. Pro'lly inconsistent
 ! about this, but something worth going through and checking.
 ! For testing remove :0 to see boundaries
 %{#%}:0
 %{##%}:0 %>:0
 

 %{t%}:t

 ! Trigger for t + d contraction in 3B
 %{X%}:0

 %^:0 ; 

!Diacritics
!  @V1@ @V2@ @V3A@ @V3B@ ; 

Sets

 ! Phonological sets
 Vowels = a e i o u y á é í ó ú ý %{ae%} ;

 Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z dh ʃ %{m%} kh sh ;
 Back = c x h ' q kh ;
 Approximants = w y ;

 ! Phonotactical sets
 StemVowel = %{e%} %{o%} %{ae%} ; 
 Gutteral = q kh c x h ' ;
 TDalt = q kh c x h ' d w y ;


 VceStop = b d g dh ɖ ;
 VcelStop = t k ;

 Dummy = %> C %{#%} %{##%} %{X%} @N@ @V1@ @V2A@ @V2B@ @V3A@ @V3B@ @PREFIXING@ @PROG@ @INF@; ! other verb classes here?

 V2Decl = @V2A@ @V2B@ ; 

 WordChars = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z '
			dh sh kh 
			á é í ó ú ý 
			%{#%} %{##%} %{m%} %{C2%} %{t%} %{d%} %{X%} %{ae%} %{ŧ%} %{đ%} %{ñ%} %{e%} %{n%} %{o%} %{GD%} ;

Definitions
 WordBoundary = [ %{##%}: | %{#%}: | %>: | %>:0 ] ;
 MorphBoundary = [ %{#%}: ] ;


Rules
! magac -> magicii, magucu
! TODO: magacu, madaxiisa/madixiisa
"Ablaut around back fricatives"
 a:Cy <=> _ Back MorphBoundary ( k:0 ) Cy ;
	where Cy in (u i)
	matched ;

! magaca
! magac%{#%}ka%{##%}
! magac%{#%}kii%{##%}


! TODO: corpus (read: google) searches reveal assimilation may be optional... magacu and magucu can be found. How to do this?
!		currently: magucu possible, magacu not.
! 		waxa+FocR#uu+Cl+Pron+Pers+SgMasc3
! wuxuu

! but not xaqiiji xiqiiji


!! !! !! !! 
!! Verbs !!
!! !! !! !! 

! NOTE: More detailed explanation is in verb-som-morph.txt

! maq^al%{#%}@V1@@PROG@ay%{#%}%{đ%}aa%{##%}
! maq^al%{#%}@V1@%{đ%}ay%{##%}
! maqal > maqlay, maqlayaa, maqal

! maqlay		maqalnay/maqallay
! maqashay		maqasheen
! maqlay		maqleen
! maqashay		

! arkay			maqalnay/maqallay
! aragtay		aragteen
! arkay			arkeen
! aragtay		

"V1: Vowel deletion"
 Vz:0 <=> %^: _ Cons MorphBoundary @V1@: (:0) Vowels  ; 
	where Vz in Vowels ;
 

"ñ realization"
 %{ñ%}:ñx <=> Declensions: (@PROG@: ) ([WordChars | WordBoundary]+) _ ;
	where Declensions in (@V1@ @V2A@ @V2B@ @V3A@ @V3B@ @PREFIXING@)
		  ñx in (n n n n n n)
	matched ;

"n realization in progressive V2"
 @PROG@:n <=> V2Decl: _ ;

"n doubling in V3A"
 @V3A@:n <=> _ :n ; 

! joogs%{o%}%{#%}@V3A@ay%{#%}
! @V3A@ -> n / [ a e ] y WordBoundary

!"infinitival -n- in Progressive"
! @V3A@:n <=> %{o%}: WordBoundary _ a y [ WordChars - %{##%}: ] ; 

"infin -n-"
 @V3A@:n <=> _ a y WordBoundary ; 

! Not using WordBoundary here because something else happens in the progressive
"đ realization"
 %{đ%}:đx <=>  Declensions: (WordChars+) _ ;
	where Declensions in (@V1@ @V2A@ @V2B@ @V3A@ @V3B@)
		  đx in (0 y y d d)
	matched ;

"đ realization in nouns"
 %{đ%}:d <=> _ MorphBoundary @N@:0 ;

! Note that we want to block this in environments where T/D (ex. dhacday)
! alternation occurs, so that that alternation can later apply. Otherwise
! these rules block each other.

! samee%{#%}@2B@y%{ŧ%}aa

! joogs%{o%}%{#%}@V3B@%{ŧ%}ay
! keen%{#%}@V3B@%{ŧ%}ay


"ŧ realization"
 %{ŧ%}:ŧx <=> ( [Cons - TDalt] ) WordBoundary Declensions: (WordChars+) _ ;
	where Declensions in (@V1@ @V2A@ @V2B@ @V3A@ @V3B@)
		  ŧx in (t s s t t)
	matched ;

! TEST: dhacday
"ŧ->d / [Gutteral] _ " 
 %{ŧ%}:d <=> [TDalt] WordBoundary @V1@: _ ;


"đ/ŧ realization in progressive"
 Cx:Cy <=> y WordBoundary _ ; 
	where Cx in (%{đ%} %{ŧ%})
		  Cy in (0 s)
	matched ;

"ŧ realization in V2B"
 %{ŧ%}:s <=> WordChars WordBoundary @V2B@: _ ;

!"o realizationn V3A"
! %{o%}:a <=> _ WordBoundary [ @V3A@: | %{ @V3A@ WordChars - a %} ] ; 

"o deletion in V3A" 
 %{o%}:0 <=> _ WordBoundary [@V3A@: | @V3B@: - @V3A@:n ] ( WordBoundary )( WordBoundary )  a ;

! samee%{#%}@V2B@yaa
"ee realization in V2B"
 %{e%}:y <=> _ WordBoundary @V2B@: [:Cons - :y] ; 

!"%{d%} realization in V3B"
! %{d%}:t <=> _ %{o%}: WordBoundary :d ; 


! [ Cons - y ]
! dad%{#%}kay%{GD%}a
! magac%{#%}káy%{GD%}a%{##%}
! warqad+N+Fem+Sg+Def+PxSg2+Nom+Prox      warqad%{#%}táa%{GD%}u%{##%}
! meel+N+Fem+Sg+Def+PxSg2+Nom+Dist        meel%{#%}táa%{GD%}ii%{##%}
! dayuurad+N+Fem+Sg+Def+PxPl1Excl+Nom+Dist        dayuurad%{#%}tayá%{GD%}ii%{##%}

"Possessive gender agreement"
 %{GD%}:Cy <=> MorphBoundary :Gender WordChars+ _ ;
	where Gender in (k g t d)
		  Cy in (g g d d)
		matched ; 

! magacayga
"Possessive gender agreement with deleted k"
 %{GD%}:g <=> MorphBoundary k:0 WordChars+ _ ;
 

"Vowel assimilation/ablaut around back fricatives"
 a:Cy <=> _ Back WordBoundary ( k ) Cy ;
    where Cy in (u i ú í)
    matched ;

! warqadda
"-t to -d next to d in definite stuff"
 t:d <=> d MorphBoundary _ Vowels ;

! buugga 
"-k to -g next to g in definite stuff"
 k:g <=> g WordBoundary _ CaseV ;
	where CaseV in (a u i á ú í)
	matched ;

! iligga
"Definite suffix -k to -g next to preceding voiced"
 k:g <=> :g WordBoundary _ Vowels ;


"-k to -g intervocalically"
  k:g <=> Vowels WordBoundary _ Vowels ;

!!! 
!!! "-t to -d intervocalically"
!!!  t:d <=> t:d WordBoundary _ Vowels ;
!!! 
!!! ! TODO: how can I combine these two?
!!! ! basically, two contexts for one rule, but optional.
!!! 

! baabuurro, dukaammo
"Declension 2: -C doubling in plural"
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> :Cz WordBoundary @N@:0 _ PlVowels ;
	where Cz in (b d dh l r n m)
	PlVowels in (a o) ;
!!! 

! miisas
"Declension 4: Plural Reduplication"
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> Cz WordBoundary @N@:0 a _ ; 
	where Cz in Cons
	matched ;



! kursiyo
! kursi%{#%}%{C2%}o%{##%}

"Declension 2: -y insertion after back sounds and fricatives; and after -i"
 %{C2%}:y <=> Cz WordBoundary @N@:0 _ PlVowels ; 
	where Cz in (c q x s j χ i %{đ%})
	PlVowels in (a o á ó) ;


! guriyo
! guri%{#%}o%{##%}

"-y- insertion in plurals"
 0:y <=> i MorphBoundary _ Vx ;
	where Vx in (a o u e á ó ú é) ;

 
"-t to 0 after -dh"
  t:0 <=> d h _ Vowels ; 


! maal^i%{m%}%{#%}ta%{##%}
! kib^is%{#%}o%{##%}
 
! galab > galbo, ilig > ilko
"Declension 3: Plural vowel deletion"
 Vz:0 <=> %^: _ Cons WordBoundary @N@:0 Vowels ; 
	where Vz in Vowels ;
 
! Doesn't work with wuxu, where k has been deleted.
! Doesn't work with magicii, magucu, but should optionally. magacii and magicii, etc are both possible

! Opacity?  wax+ku -> wax+u -> wux+u

!!! ! Didn't work: 
!!! !  a:Cy <=> _ ( [ %^ABL: ] ) Back ( Back ) ( %>: ) Cy ;
!!! 
!!! ! Need to block this before another o; magaalada, magaalooyin
!!! "Declension 6: final vowel"
!!!   %{o%}:a <=> _ WordBoundary [WordChars - o] ; 
!!! 
!!! ! WordBoundary \?:WordChars

! magaca
! magac%{#%}ka%{##%}
! magac%{#%}kii%{##%}

"Velar deletion after Back"
 k:0 <=> Back MorphBoundary _ ;




!!! ! ilig:il%^ik      NOUN3_M "tooth" ;          ! ilig, iligga, ilko, ilkaha
!!! 

! ilig
"Final lenition."
 Cv:Cx <=> Vowels:Vowels _ WordBoundary ;
  where Cx in (b d g)
        Cv in (p t k)
		matched ; 

!!! TODO: find example?
!!! "Lenition syllable finally, or before other consonants."
!!!  Cr:Cq <=> Vowels:Vowels _ WordBoundary Cons ;
!!!  where Cq in (b d g)
!!!        Cr in (p t k)
!!! 		matched ; 

! maal^i%{m%}%{#%}%{##%}
! maal^i%{m%}%{#%}o%{##%}
! maal^i%{m%}%{#%}ta%{##%}

! kul^a%{m%}%{#%}@V1@%{##%}
! maal^i%{m%}%{#%}%{##%}


! "m->n finally"
!  %{m%}:n <=> _ WordBoundary ;

"m->n in codas"
 %{m%}:n <=> _ MorphBoundary ( :0 ) [ WordBoundary | k: | t: ] ; 
 !!! where Cm in (m %{m%}) ;

! maalin, maalmo, maalinta, maalmaha, *maalim


!!! ! TODO:
!!! ! "lt:sh around word boundaries"
!!! ! l:ʃ <=> _ WordBoundary t: ;
!!! 
!!! !"Delete h after ʃ"
!!! ! h:0 <=> :ʃ _ ;
!!! 
!!! ! cat src/twol-som.txt | grep T\EST | cut -d ':' -f 2 | tr ', ' '\n' | sort | uniq | som
!!! 
!!! 
!!! ! TESTS: walaaqday, wareegtay, go'day, raacday
!!! ! must not have qaadtay
!!! 
!!! "t->d / [Gutteral] _ " 
!!!  %{t%}:d <=> TDalt WordBoundary _ ; 
!!! 
!!! 
!!! ! w a %{d%}:d %{o%}:a %{#%}:0 t a y     // wadatay
!!! ! w a %{d%}:t %{o%}:0 %{#%}:0 a y       // watay 
!!! ! w a %{d%}:t %{o%}:0 %{#%}:0 e e n     // wateen
!!! 
!!! ! TESTS: watay, wadatay, wadannay, wateen, wadeen
!!! "d->t in 3B verbs"
!!!  %{d%}:t <=> _ %{o%}: WordBoundary %{X%}:0 ;
!!! 
!!! ! easier to o-> than ... 
!!! "o->0 in 3B verbs" 
!!!  %{o%}:0 <=> _ WordBoundary %{X%}:0 ; 
!!! 
!!! ! TODO: xisbiga ; currently is xisbika. intervocalic voicing over morpheme bound.
!!! !       does this occur really often? what intervocalic consonant boundaries
!!! !		can i think of that might not work this way? 
!!! 
!!! 


!  akhri%{#%}@V1@@INF@%{##%}
!  t%{ae%}g%{#%}@V1@@INF@%{##%}
"V1 Infinitive -i-"
 @INF@:i <=>  WordChars WordChars [WordChars - i] MorphBoundary @V1@:0 _ WordBoundary ;

! i MorphBoundary @V1@:0 _ WordBoundary ; 

! t%{ae%}g%{#%}@V1@@INF@%{##%}
"a/e umlaut before i/e"
  %{ae%}:e <=> Cons _ Cons MorphBoundary ([:0]+) [ :i | :e ] ;

!!! 
!!! ! TESTS: yeedhay, gabadha
!!! "orth: delete d after dh over morph. boundaries"
!!!  d:0 <=> d h WordBoundary _ ;  
!!! 
!!! ! TESTS: gabadha 
!!! "orth: delete d after dh over morph. boundaries"
!!!  t:0 <=> d h WordBoundary _ ;  
!!! 
!!! ! duul -> duushay
!!! ! d u u l %{#%}  0 %{t%} a y
!!! 
!!! ! TESTS: duushay, gashay
!!! 

! maq^al%{#%}@V1@@PROG@ay%{#%}%{đ%}aa%{##%}
! maq^al%{#%}@V1@%{đ%}ay%{##%}
! maqal+V+2Sg+Ind+Past
! maq^al%{#%}@V1@%{ŧ%}ay%{##%}

! m:m a:a q:q %^:0 a:a l:s %{#%}:0 @V1@:0 %{d%}:t a y %{##%}:0


! lt
! sh

! l:s t:h

"lt -> sh pt 1" 
  l:s <=> _ MorphBoundary @V1@:0 %{ŧ%}:h ; 
 
"lt -> sh pt 2"
 %{ŧ%}:h <=> l:s MorphBoundary @V1@:0 _ ; 

 !  maq^al%{#%}@V1@%{ŧ%}ay%{##%}
 !"lt -> sh pt 2"
 ! %{ŧ%}:h <=> l:s MorphBoundary Dummy:0 _ ;

 ! "lt -> sh pt 2"
 !  %{ŧ%}:h <=> l:s MorphBoundary :0 _ ; 

! "lt -> sh pt 1" 
!  l:s <=> _ MorphBoundary [:0]* t:h ; 
! 
! "lt -> sh pt 2"
!  %{t%}:h <=> l:s WordBoundary _ ;

"Remove tone symbols"
 Tx:Ty <=> _ ;
	where Tx in (á é í ó ú ý)
		  Ty in (a e i o u y)
	matched ;
	
"Remove dummies"
 Dummy:0 <=> _ ;
